Louisiana, session 2026, HB1198.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:4216 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4216. Limitation of application of Chapter
A. Nothing contained in this Chapter shall apply applies to contracts of
employment of labor or to contracts for arbitration which are controlled by valid
legislation of the United States or to contracts made prior to July 28, 1948.
B. Nothing contained in this Chapter applies to contracts mandating
arbitration of child custody or visitation.
C. Arbitration of child custody or visitation is against the public policy of
this state. Any provision of an agreement to arbitrate that mandates the arbitration
of child custody or visitation is void and unenforceable.
D. No court in the state shall recognize or enforce any arbitral award
governing child custody or visitation.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1198 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 13:1805(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 13:1805(D)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1805. International application
* * *
C. A court of this state need not apply this Act if the child custody law of a
foreign country violates fundamental principles of human rights or is manifestly
contrary to the public policy of this state.
D. A child custody law of a jurisdiction of a foreign country is manifestly
contrary to the public policy of this state if any of the following apply:
(1) The law does not grant a parent the same fundamental constitutional
rights guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of
Louisiana including the right of equal protection, due process, and free exercise of
religion.
(2) The law does not use the best interest of the child as the standard for
application of child custody.
(3) The law does not consider whether domestic violence has occurred and
is likely to occur again.
(4) The law does not consider whether a determination of child custody or
visitation might risk the substantial harm of the child.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.